North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-28 Motions, Orders, and Notices [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure and held repealed by
omission from Century Code in Higgins v. Hawks, 122 N.W.2d 129 (1963).]

28-28-01.
Order defined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 7.

28-28-02.
Motions defined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 7.

28-28-03.
Motions — Notices. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 6, 7.

28-28-04.
Motions — Where heard. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were combined with section 27-05-22, which has subsequently been amended.

28-28-05.
Motions before trial judge. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 27-05-27.

28-28-06.
Preferred motions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 7.

28-28-07.
Order staying proceedings. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 62.

28-28-08.
Orders shall describe papers on which made. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 28-27-02.1, which has been superseded.

28-28-09.
Orders without notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

28-28-10.
Notices must be in writing. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 5, 7.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 27-05-28.

28-28-11.
Personal service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-12.
Service by mail — When. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-13.
Service by mail — Method of. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-14.
Service upon attorney. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-15.
Eight days’ notice on personal service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.

28-28-16.
Service by mail — Double time. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.

28-28-17.
Service may be fixed by order to show cause. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.

28-28-18.
Order to show cause. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 6.

28-28-19.
When notice unnecessary. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-20.
Service on nonresident. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-28-21.
Certain process not included. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.